Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1363
State Veterinarian; rules and regulations.

The State Veterinarian shall, subject to the approval of the Director of Agriculture, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the purpose of carrying out the Nebraska Swine Brucellosis Act. Such rules and regulations shall be reasonable, shall be based on the latest available scientific information to further the control and eradication of swine brucellosis, and shall be adaptable to and serve the best interest of the swine industry in Nebraska.

Laws 1973, LB 182, § 16;

Laws 1989, LB 38, § 6.